Mississippi, session 2026, HB4132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Kenneth Almons of Hinds County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Armed Robbery on May 7, 1993, in Hinds County, for which he was sentenced to serve four (4) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was discharged on August 4, 1995. On July 28, 2004, he was convicted of the crime of Burglary Nonresident and Possession of a Firearm in Rankin County, Mississippi, for which he was sentenced to serve three (3) years on both counts to run concurrently in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was released to Earned Release Supervision on January 14, 2006, and his sentence expired on March 28, 2006.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.